Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1601
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-1601 to 13-1626 shall be known and may be cited as the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 1.